src/smesmj-lex.txt
'Multichar_Symbols
 +A +ABBR +ACR +Abe +Acc +Actio +Actor +Adp +Adv +Ani +Attr
 +CC +CLB +CS +Card +Cmpnd +Cmpnd+ +Com +Comp +ConNeg +Cond
 +Dem +Der/Dimin +Der/Pass +Der/adda +Der/ahkes +Der/ahtes +Der/ahtes
 +Der/vuohta +Der/ahtte +Der/ahtti +Der/alla +Der/amoš +Der/asste +Der/asti 
 +Der/d +Der/dahka +Der/dahtte +Der/dalla +Der/dasste +Der/dibme +Der/duhtte
 +Der/duvva +Der/eaddji +Der/eamoš +Der/eapmi +Der/easti +Der/geahtes
 +Der/gielak +Der/gielat +Der/goahte +Der/goahti +Der/h +Der/halla +Der/heapmi
 +Der/huhtti +Der/huvva +Der/ibme +Der/j +Der/jagáš +Der/k +Der/l +Der/ladda 
 +Der/lahtte +Der/las +Der/lasj +Der/lasste +Der/laš +Der/lis +Der/lágan 
 +Der/lágaš +Der/lágán +Der/lágásj +Der/lágáš +Der/m +Der/meahttun +Der/mus
 +Der/muš +Der/n +Der/r +Der/st +Der/stahtte +Der/stalla +Der/stasste 
 +Der/stuvva +Der/supmi +Der/t +Der/u/a/åd +Der/upmi +Der/veara +Der/viđi 
 +Der/viđá +Der/vuohta +Der1 +Der2 +Der2+Der/Pass +Der3 +Der4 +Du +Du1 +Du2 +Du3
 +Ela +Ess 
 +Fem +Foc/ba +Foc/bat +Foc/be +Foc/ge +Foc/gen +Foc/ges +Foc/gis +Foc/hal 
 +Foc/han +Foc/naj +Foc/naj+Qst +Foc/son 
 +Gen +Ger +GerII +Guess 
 +IV +Ill +Imprt +ImprtII +Ind +Indef +Ine +Inf +Interj +Interr 
 +LEFT +Loc
 +Mal
 +N +Neg +Nom +Num 
 +Obj +Ord +Org 
 +PUNCT +Par +Pcle +Pers +Pl +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3 +PlGenCmp +Plc +Po +Pot +Pr +PrfPrc
 +Pron +Prop +Prs +PrsPrc +Prt 
 +PxDu1 +PxDu2 +PxDu3 +PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3 +PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3 
 +Qst +Qst+Foc/son 
 +RIGHT +Recipr +Refl +Rel
 +Sg +Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3 +SgCmp +SgGenCmp +SgNomCmp +ShCmp +Sup +Superl +Sur
 +TV +Tit 
 +V +VAbess +VGen 


LEXICON Root

 Noun ;				  
 Adjective ;	      
 Verb ;			       
 Copula ;			      
 Negativeverb ;		      
 Adverb ;			       	
 Particle ;		      
 Subjunction ;		      
 Conjunction ;		      
 Adposition ;		      
 Interjection ;		      
 Pronoun ;			      
 Numeral ;
! Acronym ;			      
! Abbreviation ;		      
! Punctuation ;		      

LEXICON n
 +N  na ;
 
LEXICON a
 +A+Attr # ;
 +A      na ;
 
LEXICON na 
 +Sg+Nom			 px ;
 +Sg+Acc			 px ;
 +Sg+Gen			 px ;
 +Sg+Ill			 px ;
 +Sg+Loc:+Sg+Ine px ;
 +Sg+Loc:+Sg+Ela px ; 
 +Sg+Com			 px ;
 +Ess				 px ;
 +Sg+Nom			 px ;
 +Sg+Acc			 px ;
 +Sg+Gen			 px ;
 +Sg+Ill			 px ;
 +Sg+Loc:Sg+Ine px ;
 +Sg+Loc:Sg+Ela px ; 
 +Sg+Com			 px ;

LEXICON px
	     K ;
 +PxSg1  K ;
 +PxDu1  K ;
 +PxPl1  K ;
 +PxSg2  K ;
 +PxDu2  K ;
 +PxPl2  K ;
 +PxSg3  K ;
 +PxDu3  K ;
 +PxPl3  K ;

LEXICON K
       # ;
! +Clt: # ;
! +Foc: # ;
! +Qst: # ;

LEXICON v
 +V+Inf          #  ;
 +V+Actio	     #  ;
 +V+Actio+Loc    #  ;
 +V+Actio+Ess    #  ;
 +V+PrfPrc	     #  ;
 +V+PrsPrc	     #  ;
 +V                mod ;

LEXICON Negativeverb
 ii+V+Neg:ij+V+Neg+Prs mod ;
 ii+V+Neg:ij+V+Neg+Prt mod ; 
                 
LEXICON mod                 
 +Ind+Prs      pn ;
 +Ind+Prt      pn ;
 +Imprt        pn ;
 +Cond+Prs     pn ;
 +Pot+Prs      pn ;


 
LEXICON pn
 +Sg1  K ;
 +Sg2  K ;
 +Sg3  K ;
 +Sg3  K ;
 +Du1  K ;
 +Du2  K ;
 +Du3  K ;
 +Pl1  K ;
 +Pl2  K ;
 +Pl3  K ;
 +Pl3  K ;

LEXICON pers1
 +Pron+Pers+Sg1 # ;
 +Pron+Pers+Du1 # ;
 +Pron+Pers+Pl1 # ;

LEXICON pers2
 +Pron+Pers+Sg2 # ;
 +Pron+Pers+Du2 # ;
 +Pron+Pers+Pl2 # ;

LEXICON pers3
 +Pron+Pers+Sg3 # ;
 +Pron+Pers+Du3 # ;
 +Pron+Pers+Pl3 # ;


LEXICON adv
 +Adv # ;
 
LEXICON cs 
 +CS # ;
 
LEXICON cc
 +CC # ;
 
LEXICON adp
 +Adp # ;
 
LEXICON postp
 +Po # ;
 
LEXICON prep
 +Pr # ;
 
LEXICON pcle
 +Pcle # ; 
 
LEXICON interj
 +Interj # ;
 
LEXICON num
 +Num+Sg+Nom # ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen # ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc # ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill # ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:+Num+Sg+Ine # ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:+Num+Sg+Ela # ;
 +Num+Sg+Com # ;
 +Num+Ess	 # ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom # ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen # ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc # ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill # ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:+Num+Pl+Ine # ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:+Num+Pl+Ela # ;
 +Num+Pl+Com # ;
